Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 34 Medical Professionals for Rural Assistance

Cross references.

Physicians, T. 43, C. 34.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Physicians for rural areas assistance program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Board for Physician Workforce, Chapter 195-12.